Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 4

Public Morals

6-54-401. Enforcement of laws for protection of public morals.

It is the duty of the mayors, commissioners, council members, aldermen, chiefs of police, recorders, municipal judges, marshals, and police officers of each municipal corporation, to faithfully maintain and enforce, within the corporate limits of their respective municipalities, the statute laws relating to lewdness, drunkenness, gaming, and the sale and manufacture of intoxicating liquors, by having arrested and arraigned for trial all persons violating such laws with their knowledge, and by taking such other proceedings against such violators as may be authorized and provided by the ordinances of such municipalities.

Acts 1915, ch. 37, § 1; Shan., § 1996a1; Code 1932, § 3499; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-614.

Cross-References. Duties of officers of justice in general, title 38, ch. 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 5.

6-54-402. Failure to enforce laws.

The willful failure or neglect of any of such officials or police officers to perform the duties prescribed by § 6-54-401 is a Class C misdemeanor and the offender shall be dismissed from office.

Acts 1915, ch. 37, § 2; Shan., § 1996a2; Code 1932, § 3500; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-615; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Collateral References.

Liability of municipality or other governmental unit for failure to provide police protection. 46 A.L.R.3d 1084.

6-54-403. Motion picture regulatory board — Creation.

Any municipality in a county having a population of not less than two hundred thousand (200,000), according to the federal census of 1960 or any subsequent federal census, may by ordinance create and establish a regulatory board for the review and classification of commercial motion picture films, which board shall have the powers herein set forth. The number of members of such board and their terms of office shall be set forth in such ordinance.

Acts 1969, ch. 306, §§ 1, 5; T.C.A., § 6-647.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Law Reviews.

Film Is a Four Letter Word, 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1975).

6-54-404. Motion picture regulatory board — Definition of “minor.”

For the purpose of §§ 6-54-403 — 6-54-406 “minor” means any person under eighteen (18) years of age.

Acts 1969, ch. 306, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-648.

6-54-405. Motion picture regulatory board — Powers.

The motion picture regulatory board may be empowered to classify commercial motion picture films prior to or after the commencement of their presentation to the public as to their suitability for viewing by minors, and to forbid the showing of commercial films to minors unless information on the film has been submitted to the board for classification of the film in accordance with reasonable or expeditious procedures, and the film has either been classified by the board as suitable for minors or has not been classified within a reasonable time after submission.

Acts 1969, ch. 306, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-649.

6-54-406. Motion picture regulatory board — Enforcement of orders.

The municipality may enforce the lawful orders of the board by fine or other penalty within the power of the municipality to impose, and by obtaining an injunction in any circuit, chancery or criminal court of this state against the showing to minors of any motion picture film that has not been presented to the board for classification in accordance with such ordinance and such reasonable rules as the board may adopt, or that has been classified by the board, pursuant to its authorized procedures, as unsuitable for minors.

The circuit, chancery and criminal courts have jurisdiction to enjoin the presentation to minors of any motion picture film in violation of any ordinance adopted pursuant to §§ 6-54-403 — 6-54-406, or in violation of any lawful classification, regulation or order of any board established pursuant hereto.

In any suit for injunction to forbid the presentation to minors of a motion picture classified as not suitable for minors, the proceedings shall be in accordance with those set forth in § 39-17-908, and no municipality or board shall be required to file any injunction, cost or appeal bond.

Acts 1969, ch. 306, § 3; T.C.A., § 6-650; Acts 1996, ch. 675, § 9.